Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1902
State Department of Education; cooperation with Department of Health and Human Services; develop educational packet; contents.

(1) The State Department of Education, in cooperation with the Department of Health and Human Services, shall develop a packet entitled "Learning Begins at Birth" to be given to the parents of each child born in this state on and after January 1, 2003.

(2) The packet shall contain information about child development, child care, how children learn, children's health including, on and after July 14, 2006, information on decreasing the risk of sudden unexplained infant death syndrome and abusive head trauma in infants and children, services available to children and parents, and any other information deemed relevant by the Department of Health and Human Services or the State Department of Education. The State Department of Education shall indicate which information in the packet is appropriate for the parents of infants, for the parents of toddlers, and for the parents of preschoolers.

(3) The State Department of Education shall develop a variety of types of the packet, based on the needs of parents. The information in the packets may be in the form of printed material or in the form of video tapes, audio cassettes, or other appropriate media.

Laws 2002, LB 326, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 109;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 714;

Laws 2019, LB60, § 5.